District of Columbia statutes.
47-2712

Electrical fees.

(a)

The Mayor of the District of Columbia shall amend from time to time the schedule of fees to be charged by the District of Columbia for the inspection of electrical equipment and for the issuance of permits to perform electrical services. The Mayor shall amend the schedule by rule to provide for fees in amounts as in his judgment will defray the approximate costs of performing inspections and issuing permits.

(b)

Until the schedule of fees is amended by the Mayor in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, the schedule of fees to be charged by the District of Columbia for the inspection of electrical equipment and for the issuance of permits to perform electrical services is as follows:

GROUP 1. WIRING ONLY

Fee

Outlets - each 10
$ 7.00

Outlet means and includes receptacle, switch and fixture outlet

GROUP 2. FIXTURES AND LAMPHOLDERS

Each 10
3.00

GROUP 3. ELECTRICAL DISCHARGE SIGNS

1st 500 va
12.00

Each additional 500 va
7.00

GROUP 4. HEATING EQUIPMENT

Baseboard or spaceheaters

1st 10 KW - per each KW
3.00

Each additional KW
2.00

Unit heaters, furnaces - Motors not included
15.00

Each additional
7.00

Controls only - Each
9.00

For units with motors - Add appropriate motor from Group 6

GROUP 5. COMMERCIAL HEATING AND COOKING

Appliances other than Group 4

1st 1-8 KW
12.00

Each additional
7.00

1st-over 8 KW
15.00

Each additional
7.00

GROUP 6. MOTORS AND GENERATORS

Less than 1/4 H.P.
Apply Group 2

1/4 H.P. to 1 H.P.
12.00

Each additional
7.00

Over 1 H.P. to 5 H.P.
19.00

Each additional
7.00

Over 5 H.P. to 10 H.P.
30.00

Each additional
12.00

Over 10 H.P. to 20 H.P.
36.00

Each additional
15.00

Over 20 H.P. to 30 H.P.
47.00

Each additional
22.00

Over 30 H.P. to 50 H.P.
57.00

Each additional
24.00

Over 50 H.P. to 75 H.P.
69.00

Each additional
30.00

Over 75 H.P.
78.00

Each additional
36.00

For installation of more than 1 motor, the initial fee shall be the largest motor fee plus the additional fee for the smaller.

GROUP 7. SERVICE

Piped house connection
7.00

Each additional
3.00

Pole line on private property
7.00

Each additional
3.00

Conductors, including pole
9.00

Each additional
3.00

Service conductors - Each
7.00

GROUP 8. SERVICE AND METER EQUIPMENT

0 to 200 amperes
15.00

Each additional
7.00

201 to 400 amperes
22.00

Each additional
12.00

401 to 800 amperes
42.00

Each additional
22.00

Over 800 amperes
63.00

Each additional
30.00

Relocation, replacement or original installation, including meter connection facilities. For installation of more than 1 service equipment, the initial fee shall be for the largest service equipment plus the additional fee for the smaller.

GROUP 9. TRANSFORMERS

1 to 10 KVA
12.00

Each additional
7.00

11 to 75 KVA
19.00

Each additional
9.00

76 to 200 KVA
24.00

Each additional
12.00

Vault
63.00

Each additional
30.00

GROUP 10. THEATRES OR OTHER PLACES OF PUBLIC ASSEMBLY: SPOTLIGHTS

Arc
12.00

Each additional
7.00

Incandescent
7.00

Each additional
3.00

Portable or temporary arc
9.00

Each additional
7.00

Portable or temporary incandescent
7.00

Each additional
3.00

Motion picture machine

Permanent
30.00

Each additional
15.00

Portable
19.00

Each additional
9.00

Slide projector
15.00

Each additional
9.00

Amplifier
12.00

Each additional
7.00

Dimmers (over 1 KW)
9.00

Each additional
7.00

Portable switchboard
12.00

Each additional
7.00

Portable T.V. installation

1st portable T.V. receiver
11.00

Each additional receiver
5.00

Portable or temporary incandescent lamps (other than spotlights)

1 to 25 lights
9.00

26 to 50 lights
13.00

51 to 100 lights
19.00

Each additional 100 lights
5.00

GROUP 11. TEMPORARY INSTALLATIONS

Decorations, lawn fetes, etc.

1 to 25 lights - 1st 90 days
12.00

Each additional 90 days
7.00

26 to 50 lights - 1st 90 days
19.00

Each additional 90 days
9.00

51 to 100 lights - 1st 90 days
24.00

Each additional 90 days
12.00

Each additional 100 lights - 1st 90 days
7.00

Each additional 90 days
3.00

Use of current on wiring, apparatus and fixtures for use pending completion of

installation - 1st 90 days
24.00

Each additional 90 days
12.00

Circuses and Carnivals

1st 50 KW
63.00

Each additional 100 KW
63.00

Exhibitions, etc.

1st 3,000 sq. ft.
27.00

Each additional 1,000 sq. ft.
15.00

GROUP 12. RADIO AND TELEVISION EQUIPMENT

Transmitting station - 1st
36.00

Each additional
19.00

Receiving station

Antenna and ground connection device for receivers - 1st
7.00

Each additional 10
7.00

Centralized speaker station - 1st 10
7.00

Each additional 10
7.00

Centralized receiver amplifier
12.00

Each additional
12.00

Closed circuit television camera - 1st camera
9.00

Each additional camera
7.00

GROUP 13. MISCELLANEOUS

Arc vapor lamps - 1st
9.00

Each additional
7.00

Battery charges
13.00

Each additional
7.00

Electric ranges (residential)
7.00

Each additional
2.00

Clothes dryer (residential)
7.00

Each additional
2.00

Garbage disposal (residential)
7.00

Each additional
3.00

X-Ray machine
12.00

Each additional
7.00

Dishwasher (residential)
7.00

Each additional
3.00

Hot water heater (residential)
7.00

Each additional
3.00

Fire alarm station and bell
Apply Group 1

Electric signs - Incandescent
Apply Group 2

Festoon lighting
Apply Group 2

Air conditioner - Central system

Not over 5 tons (residential) 1st
30.00

2nd to 25th, each
10.00

Above 25, each
7.00

Rectifier
15.00

Each additional
7.00

Welders
15.00

Each additional
7.00

Minimum fee
7.00

Portable equipment on circuits 20 amperes or less
No Fee

Electric furnaces (residential)

1st
15.00

2nd
12.00

Over 25, each
7.00

Electric cranes for construction work
67.00

Replacement of feeder conductors:

Per feeder (old work) 1st
7.00

Each additional
3.00

Panel board replacement

1st panel board (old work)
7.00

Each additional
3.00

Installation of empty conduits:

Per floor
7.00

Duplicates - Preliminary and final certificates of performance or correction of records
7.00

Quarterly permits - The fee for quarterly permits to install circuits, fixtures and receptacles shall be in accordance with the work

done, in no case less than $27 payable at the time the permit is issued
27.00

Defect reinspection fee
13.00

When the applicant receives a written notice of defects found during the original inspection and the applicant or his agent reports the defects have been corrected, and upon inspection of the defect, noted originally, it is revealed that the defects have not been fully corrected, a charge of $13 will be made for each inspection thereafter
13.00

REFUNDSA refund of permit fees shall be made as follows:

(1)

When no work has been done under authority of a permit, the fee in excess of the costs of inspection to verify no work having been done, based on $13 per inspector hour, the cost of any engineering examination time previously devoted to approval of plans based on $20 per hour, plus $19 administrative costs of “issuance and refund”, shall be refunded 19.00

(2)

When work authorized by permit has been only partially done and when the District is satisfied that no more work will be done under the permit, the fee in excess of the cost of any engineering plans examination based on $20 per hour, cost of inspections made, based on $13 per hour, plus $19 administrative costs of “issuance and refund”, shall be refunded 19.00

(3)

Provided, that the request for refund shall be made within six months from the date of issuance and the permit and receipt are returned to the Permit Branch.

PENALTYThe penalty for a permit to abate notice of doing work without a permit shall be 50 percent of the fee.

WAIVER OF PERMIT FEESNo permit fee shall be charged when supported by evidence indicating that the applicant is under contract or subcontract to perform the following:

(1)

Work done exclusively for the District of Columbia.

(2)

Work done under contract for the District of Columbia.

(3)

Work done exclusively for agencies of the United States government.

History

Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title III, § 301, 23 DCR 2461
June 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-14, § 202(a), 30 DCR 2632
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Cross References

Mayor, Council and other officers, licensing and registration fees, Mayor’s power to fix, see § 1-301.74.
Mayor, Council and other officers, Mayor’s power to increase or decrease fees authorized in § 1-301.74, see § 1-301.75.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-301.74.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2712.
1973 Ed., § 47-2212.

Editor's Notes

Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 1102 of D.C. Law 5-14 provided that the Mayor shall issue rules necessary to carry out the provisions of the act.